Alaska statutes. Title 26. Military Affairs, Veterans, Disasters, and Aerospace.
Article 1. Veterans’ Services.

Administrative Code. —

For reimbursement of veterans’ service organizations for rehabilitation and service work, see 10 AAC 10.

Sec. 26.10.010.
Regulations.

The Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs shall adopt regulations necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

History.

(§ 3 ch 109 SLA 1951; am E.O. No. 58, § 8 (1984); am § 13 ch 126 SLA 1994)

Sec. 26.10.020.
Veterans service fund. [Repealed, § 12 ch 42 SLA 1997.]

Sec. 26.10.030.
Acceptance of gifts, donations, and grants.

The Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs may receive gifts, donations, and grants from any person or agency. All gifts, donations, and grants shall be used in accordance with the donor’s instructions.

History.

(§ 5 ch 109 SLA 1951; am E.O. No. 58, § 9 (1984); am § 2 ch 42 SLA 1997)

Sec. 26.10.040.
Training in rehabilitation and service work.

The Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs may approve expenditures by veterans’ organizations and may reimburse them for their expenditures in employing full time service officers, for necessary travel expenses, including travel by service officers outside of the state not more than once each year for purposes of training in veterans’ rehabilitation and service work, and for per diem not exceeding that allowed state employees.
The department shall limit payments to veterans’ organizations to an amount that will fairly compensate them for salaries and expenses paid to their full time service officers in performing rehabilitation work for veterans, including the prosecution of their claims and solution of their problems arising out of military service. This service and assistance shall be given to all veterans and their dependents and to all beneficiaries of any military claim and shall include but not be limited to those services now given by the service departments of the respective organizations.

History.

(§ 6 ch 109 SLA 1951; am § 1 ch 161 SLA 1955; am E.O. No. 58, § 10 (1984))

Administrative Code. —

For reimbursement of veterans service organizations for rehabilitation and service work, see 10 AAC 10.

Sec. 26.10.050.
Approval of payments.

Payment to a veterans’ organization shall first be approved by the Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs and so far as possible shall be on an equitable basis for rehabilitation work done.

History.

(§ 7 ch 109 SLA 1951; am E.O. No. 58, § 11 (1984))

Administrative Code. —

For reimbursement of veterans service organizations for rehabilitation and service work, see 10 AAC 10.